Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.75
References to prior act and agency; how construed.

On and after July 19, 1996, all references in statutes, rules, regulations, ordinances, resolutions, and other documents to the Nebraska Disaster and Civil Defense Act of 1973 shall be construed to mean the Emergency Management Act and all references in statutes, rules, regulations, ordinances, resolutions, and other documents to the civil defense agency in the Adjutant General's office shall be construed to mean the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency.

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 49.